Missouri, session 2026, HB2492.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 571.014, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 571.014 and 571.515, to read as follows:
571.014. 1. A person commits the crime of unlawful refusal to transfer by denying
sale of a firearm to a nonlicensee, who is otherwise not prohibited from possessing a firearm
under state or federal law, solely on the basis that the nonlicensee purchased a firearm that
was later the subject of a trace request by law enforcement.
2. Violation of subsection 1 of this section shall be a class A misdemeanor.
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, other than the
provisions of section 571.515, no federal firearms dealer licensed under 18 U.S.C. Section
923 who engages in the sale of firearms within this state shall fail or refuse to complete the
sale of a firearm to a customer in every case in which the sale is authorized by federal law.
4. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any individual federal firearms
license holder, his agents, or employees to the extent they chose in their individual judgment
to not complete the sale or transfer of a firearm for articulable reasons specific to that
transaction, so long as those reasons are not based on the race, gender, religion, creed of the
buyer.
571.515. 1. As used in this section, the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Contact person", the person designated as a contact pursuant to subsection
3 of this section by the person voluntarily waiving the right to purchase a firearm;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2492 2
(2) "Department", the Missouri department of public safety;
(3) "Voluntary waiver", a voluntary waiver of the right to purchase a firearm as
described in this section.
2. (1) A person may voluntarily waive the right to purchase a firearm. While
such waiver is in effect, no person shall sell or otherwise transfer a firearm to a person
who voluntarily waived the right to purchase a firearm.
(2) The department shall promulgate forms for a person to file either in person
or electronically for a voluntary waiver, to update contact information, and to revoke a
voluntary waiver.
3. (1) To voluntarily waive the right to purchase a firearm, a person shall file a
voluntary waiver with the department. The department shall verify the person's
identity prior to accepting the voluntary waiver.
(2) A person who voluntarily waives the right to purchase a firearm may
designate one or more contact persons who will be contacted, pursuant to this section, if
the person attempts to purchase a firearm while the voluntary waiver is in effect or if
the person revokes the voluntary waiver.
(3) The department shall immediately notify the person who filed the voluntary
waiver and each contact person when the department accepts the filer's voluntary
waiver.
(4) No later than twenty-four hours after accepting a voluntary waiver, the
department shall enter the voluntary waiver into the National Instant Criminal
Background Check System and any other federal or state computer-based systems used
by law enforcement agencies or others to identify prohibited purchasers of firearms.
(5) All forms or records filed pursuant to this section shall be confidential and
shall be closed records under chapter 610.
4. Within twenty-four hours of an attempted transfer of a firearm to a person
with a voluntary waiver, the department shall notify each contact person for such
person.
5. (1) To revoke a voluntary waiver, a person shall file for revocation with the
department. The department shall verify the person's identity prior to accepting the
revocation. The waiver shall remain in effect for thirty days after the department
accepts the revocation.
(2) The department shall notify each contact person of the revocation no later
than twenty-four hours after the department receives the revocation request.
(3) Thirty days after the department accepts the revocation, and unless the
person is otherwise ineligible to possess a firearm pursuant to state or federal law, the
department shall remove the person's information from the National Instant Criminal

HB 2492 3
Background Check System and any other federal or state computer-based systems in
which the person was entered and that are used by law enforcement agencies or others
to identify prohibited purchasers of firearms, and the department shall destroy all
records of the voluntary waiver.
6. The submission of a voluntary waiver shall be made only by the person to
whom the voluntary waiver shall apply. Any person that attempts to submit a voluntary
waiver on behalf of another person shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
7. The department may promulgate rules to implement the provisions of this
section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers
vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the
effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August
28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔